Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 6. Licensing and Registration

§ 151.
Licensing and registration; violations.

This subchapter shall apply to all licenses, registrations, and applications for licenses and registrations that the Commissioner or the Department may issue or grant unless otherwise specifically provided.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules governing applications for and issuance, revocation, term, and renewal of licenses and registrations. In the rules, the Commissioner may prescribe standards and conditions to be met, records to be kept, and reports to be filed. Licenses and registration shall be for a term of one year from issuance unless otherwise prescribed by rule.

Premises covered by a license or registration may be visited and inspected by the Department at reasonable hours. A person who accepts a license or registration shall permit visits and inspections and examinations of the records he or she is required to keep.

A license or registration may be revoked for cause after hearing and may be suspended in situations that immediately imperil the health, safety, or well-being of persons in the care of the licensee or registrant.

Before a license is granted, the Department shall visit and inspect the premises for which the license is requested and make further inquiry and investigation as the Commissioner may direct. Before a family child care home registration is granted, the Department shall make inquiry and investigation. Inquiry and investigation may include a visit to and inspection of the premises for which the registration is requested. Further inquiry and investigation may be made as the Commissioner may direct.

Whenever the Attorney General has reason to believe that a facility required by the Commissioner to be licensed or registered is being operated without such license or registration, the Attorney General may bring an action for equitable relief in the name of the State against the operator of such facility to restrain such operation. The action may be brought in the Superior Court of the county in which the facility is located. The court is authorized to grant equitable relief to restrain and prevent such operation.

Any person who violates the terms of an injunction or restraining order issued under subdivision (5) of this section shall forfeit and pay to the State a civil penalty of not more than $100.00 for each violation. In such cases, the Attorney General acting in the name of the State may petition for recovery of such civil penalty.

Whenever the Department determines that a licensed child care facility or registered family child care home has violated a health or safety rule, the facility or home shall post the Department’s notice of violation in a conspicuous place in the facility or home. In the case of a serious violation, as defined by the Department by rule, the facility or home shall also notify by mail a person responsible for the welfare of each child attending that facility or home. A serious violation shall include violation of group size and staffing requirements and any violation involving a situation that immediately imperils the health, safety, or well-being of persons in the care of the licensee or registrant.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. May 20, 2014; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 277.

§ 152.
Access to records.

The Commissioner may obtain from the Vermont Crime Information Center the record of convictions of any person to the extent required by law or the Commissioner has determined by rule that such information is necessary to regulate a facility or individual subject to regulation by the Department or to carry out the Department’s child protection obligations under chapters 49-59 of this title. The Commissioner shall first notify the person whose record is being requested.

The owner or operator of a facility licensed or registered by the Department may ask the Commissioner for the record of convictions and the record of substantiated reports of child abuse of a current employee or a person to whom the owner or operator has given a conditional offer of employment. The request shall be in writing and shall be accompanied by a release signed by the current or prospective employee. The owner or operator shall inform the current or prospective employee that he or she has the right to appeal the accuracy and completeness of the record. Upon receiving a request under this subsection, the Commissioner shall ask the Vermont Crime Information Center for the record of convictions of the current or prospective employee.

If the person has a record of convictions, the Commissioner shall provide the owner or operator with a copy of the record. If the person has a record of substantiated reports of child abuse, the Commissioner shall inform the requesting owner or operator that such record exists.

Information released to an owner or operator under this section shall not be released or disclosed by the owner or operator to any other person. Release or disclosure of such information by an owner or operator may result in the loss of the license or registration.

As used in this section:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner’s designee.

“Employee” shall include volunteers.

“Substantiated reports of child abuse” means reports of child abuse substantiated under section 4915 of this title.

“Volunteer” means an individual who, without compensation, provides services through a public or private organization.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. May 20, 2014; amended

2015, No. 60

, § 12.